Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0312.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 12a. (1) No later than 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall establish a process by which a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home may request a review and appeal of a determination by the department that the child care center, group child care home, or family child care home violated a rule promulgated under this act and the violation does not result in a denial, revocation, or refusal to renew the license of a child care center, group child care home, or family child care home under this act or an injunction under section 13. (2) The process established under subsection (1) must be in writing and posted publicly on the department's website.